Nebraska, session 109, LB277.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB277 LB277
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 29-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-1401 (1) The district courts are hereby vested with power to call
grand juries.
(2) A grand jury may be called and summoned in the manner provided
by law on such day of a regular term of the district court in each year
in each county of the state as the district court may direct and at such
other times and upon such notice as the district court may deem
necessary.
(3) District courts shall call a grand jury in each case that a
petition meets the requirements of section 32-628, includes a recital as
to the reason for requesting the convening of the grand jury and a
specific reference to the statute or statutes which are alleged to have
been violated, and is signed not more than ninety days prior to the date
of filing under section 29-1401.02 by not less than ten percent of the
registered voters of the county who cast votes for the office of Governor
in such county at the most recent general election held for such office.
(4) District courts shall call a grand jury in each case upon
certification by the county coroner or coroner's physician that a person
has died while being apprehended by or while in the custody of a law
enforcement officer or detention personnel. In each case subject to this
subsection:
(a) Law enforcement personnel from the jurisdiction in which the
death occurred shall immediately secure the scene, preserve all evidence,
and investigate the matter as in any other homicide. The case shall be
treated as an open, ongoing matter until all evidence, reports, and other
relevant material which has been assembled are transferred to the special
prosecutor appointed a prosecuting attorney selected pursuant to
subdivision (b) of this subsection;
(b) The county attorney or a member of his or her staff shall be the
prosecuting attorney. Except as provided in subdivision (d) of this
-2-

LB277 LB277
2025 2025
subsection, the prosecuting attorney shall, as soon as practicable, the
court shall appoint a special prosecutor who has had at least five years
of experience in criminal litigation, including felony litigation. The
special prosecutor shall select a team of three peace officers trained to
investigate homicides. Such At least two of such investigators shall be
from jurisdictions outside the jurisdiction where agencies other than the
agency under which the death occurred. The team shall examine all
evidence concerning the cause of death and present the findings of its
investigation to the special prosecutor prosecuting attorney;
(c) A grand jury shall be impaneled within thirty days after the
certification by the county coroner or coroner's physician, unless the
court extends such time period upon the showing of a compelling reason;
and
(d) A special prosecutor need not be appointed in In those cases in
which the death has been certified by a licensed practicing physician to
be from natural causes , and the county attorney or a member of his or
her staff presents may present such finding to a grand jury; and without
selecting a three-member team of peace officers to investigate.
(e) Any law enforcement officer or detention personnel who were
involved in the death shall not return to duty until the grand jury has
completed its investigation.
Sec. 2. Original section 29-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-